Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 24A.5, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 116, O.S.L. 2024 (51 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 24A.5), is amended to read as follows:


Section 24A.5. All records of public bodies and public


officials shall be open to any person for inspection, copying, or


mechanical reproduction during regular business hours; provided:


1. The Oklahoma Open Records Act, Sections 24A.1 through 24A.30


24A.34 of this title, does not apply to records specifically


required by law to be kept confidential including:


a. records protected by a state evidentiary privilege


such as the attorney-client privilege, the work

Req. No. 1333 Page 1


product immunity from discovery and the identity of


informer privileges,


b. records of what transpired during meetings of a public


body lawfully closed to the public such as executive


sessions authorized under the Oklahoma Open Meeting


Act,


c. personal information within driver records as defined


by the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act, 18 United


States Code, Sections 2721 through 2725,


d. information in the files of the Board of Medicolegal


Investigations obtained pursuant to Sections 940 and


941 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes that may be


hearsay, preliminary unsubstantiated investigation-


related findings, or confidential medical information,


e. any test forms, question banks and answer keys


developed for state licensure examinations, but


specifically excluding test preparation materials or


study guides,


f. last names, addresses, Social Security numbers or tax


identification numbers, and proof of identification


submitted to the Oklahoma Lottery Commission by


persons claiming a lottery prize,


g. unless public disclosure is required by other laws or


regulations, vehicle movement records of the Oklahoma

Req. No. 1333 Page 2


Transportation Authority obtained in connection with


the Authority’s electronic toll collection system,


h. personal financial information, credit reports, or


other financial data obtained by or submitted to a


public body for the purpose of evaluating credit


worthiness, obtaining a license, permit, or for the


purpose of becoming qualified to contract with a


public body,


i. any digital audio/video recordings of the toll


collection and safeguarding activities of the Oklahoma


Transportation Authority,


j. any personal information provided by a guest at any


facility owned or operated by the Oklahoma Tourism and


Recreation Department to obtain any service at the


facility or by a purchaser of a product sold by or


through the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation


Department,


k. a Department of Defense Form 214 (DD Form 214) filed


with a county clerk, including any DD Form 214 filed


before July 1, 2002,


l. except as provided for in Section 2-110 of Title 47 of


the Oklahoma Statutes:


(1) any record in connection with a Motor Vehicle


Report issued by the Department of Public Safety,

Req. No. 1333 Page 3


as prescribed in Section 6-117 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, or


(2) personal information within driver records, as


defined by the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act,


U.S.C., Sections 2721 through 2725, which are


stored and maintained by the Department of Public


Safety,


m. any portion of any document or information provided to


an agency or entity of the state or a political


subdivision to obtain licensure under the laws of this


state or a political subdivision that contains an


applicant’s personal address, personal phone number,


personal email address, any government-issued


identification numbers, or other contact information;


provided, however, lists of persons licensed, the


existence of a license of a person, or a business or


commercial address, or other business or commercial


information disclosable under state law submitted with


an application for licensure shall be public record,


unless the business or commercial address is the same


as the applicant’s personal address, except when the


applicant permits in writing the disclosure of the


address,



Req. No. 1333 Page 4


n. an investigative file obtained during an investigation


conducted by the State Department of Health into


violations of the Long-Term Care Administrator


Licensing Act under Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


or


o. documents, evidence, materials, records, reports,


complaints, or other information in the possession or


control of the Attorney General or Insurance


Department pertaining to an evaluation, examination,


investigation, or review made pursuant to the


provisions of the Patient’s Right to Pharmacy Choice


Act, the Pharmacy Audit Integrity Act, or Sections 357


through 360 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. All Social Security numbers included in a record may be


confidential regardless of the person’s status as a public employee


or private individual and may be redacted or deleted prior to


release of the record by the public body;


3. Any reasonably segregable portion of a record containing


exempt material shall be provided after deletion of the exempt


portions; provided however, the Department of Public Safety shall


not be required to assemble for the requesting person specific


information, in any format, from driving records relating to any


person whose name and date of birth or whose driver license number


is not furnished by the requesting person.

Req. No. 1333 Page 5


The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall not be required


to assemble for the requesting person any criminal history records


relating to persons whose names, dates of birth, and other


identifying information required by the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation pursuant to administrative rule are not furnished by


the requesting person;


4. Any request for a record which contains individual records


of persons, and the cost of copying, reproducing or certifying each


individual record is otherwise prescribed by state law, the cost may


be assessed for each individual record, or portion thereof requested


as prescribed by state law. Otherwise, a public body may charge a


fee only for recovery of the reasonable, direct costs of record


copying, or mechanical reproduction. Notwithstanding any state or


local provision to the contrary, in no instance shall the record


copying fee exceed twenty-five cents ($0.25) per page for records


having the dimensions of eight and one-half (8 1/2) by fourteen (14)


inches or smaller, or a maximum of One Dollar ($1.00) per copied


page for a certified copy. However, if the request:


a. is solely for commercial purpose, or


b. would clearly cause excessive disruption of the


essential functions of the public body,


then the public body may charge a reasonable fee to recover the


direct cost of record search and copying; however, publication in a


newspaper or broadcast by news media for news purposes shall not

Req. No. 1333 Page 6


constitute a resale or use of a record for trade or commercial


purpose and charges for providing copies of electronic data to the


news media for a news purpose shall not exceed the direct cost of


making the copy. The fee charged by the Department of Public Safety


for a copy in a computerized format of a record of the Department


shall not exceed the direct cost of making the copy unless the fee


for the record is otherwise set by law.


Any public body establishing fees under this act shall post a


written schedule of the fees at its principal office and with the


county clerk.


In no case shall a search fee be charged when the release of


records is in the public interest, including, but not limited to,


release to the news media, scholars, authors and taxpayers seeking


to determine whether those entrusted with the affairs of the


government are honestly, faithfully, and competently performing


their duties as public servants.


The fees shall not be used for the purpose of discouraging


requests for information or as obstacles to disclosure of requested


information;


5. The land description tract index of all recorded instruments


concerning real property required to be kept by the county clerk of


any county shall be available for inspection or copying in


accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Open Records Act;



Req. No. 1333 Page 7


provided, however, the index shall not be copied or mechanically


reproduced for the purpose of sale of the information;


6. A public body must provide prompt, reasonable access to its


records but may establish reasonable procedures which protect the


integrity and organization of its records and to prevent excessive


disruptions of its essential functions. A delay in providing access


to records shall be limited solely to the time required for


preparing the requested documents and the avoidance of excessive


disruptions of the public body’s essential functions. If a records


request cannot be completed within ten (10) business days of the


request, a person designated pursuant to paragraph 7 of this section


shall provide written notice to the requestor indicating the reason


for the delay and specifying a date within a reasonable time when


the information requested will be available for inspection or


duplication. In no event may production of a current request for


records be unreasonably delayed until after completion of a prior


records request that will take substantially longer than the current


request. Any public body which makes the requested records


available on the Internet shall meet the obligation of providing


prompt, reasonable access to its records as required by this


paragraph; and


7. A public body shall designate certain persons who are


authorized to release records of the public body for inspection,


copying, or mechanical reproduction. At least one person shall be

Req. No. 1333 Page 8


available at all times to release records during the regular


business hours of the public body.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1333 TEK 1/16/2025 3:32:30 PM







































Req. No. 1333 Page 9